South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 18, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-18-75.  (A) No private investigator or any member of his private investigation business may reveal information relating to the representation of a client unless the: (1) client gives informed consent; (2) disclosure is impliedly authorized in order to carry out the representation; or (3) disclosure is permitted by subsection (B). (B) A private investigator may reveal information relating to the representation of a client to the extent the private investigator reasonably believes necessary to: (1) prevent the client from committing a criminal act; (2) prevent reasonably certain death or substantial bodily harm; (3) secure legal advice about the private investigator's compliance with applicable laws and regulations; (4) establish a claim or defense on behalf of the private investigator in a controversy between the private investigator and the client or to establish a defense to a criminal charge or civil claim against the private investigator based upon conduct in which the client was involved, or to respond to allegations in a proceeding concerning the private investigator's representation of the client; or (5) comply with a law or court order. (C) It is unlawful for a private investigator or any member of the private investigator's private investigation business to: (1) knowingly represent a person whose interests are materially adverse to that of the private investigator's current or former client unless the current or former client, as applicable, gives informed consent; (2) use information relating to the representation to the disadvantage of a current or former client except as specifically permitted by this section or when the information has become generally known; or (3) reveal information in violation of this section. (D) In addition to other penalties for a violation of the provisions of this chapter, a person who violates the provisions of this section must reimburse any and all current and former clients for any and all payments made to the private investigator or private investigation business for a representation that violates this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----